Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2615
Sales of swine; packer; failure to make reports; false information; penalties.

The failure of a packer to report information to the department as required in section 54-2613 is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day that a complete report is not made available to the department. The intentional reporting of false information by a packer in the report to the department required in section 54-2613 is a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 15.